apertium-yua.yua.lexc
LEXICON IntransitiveSetB
%<s_sg1%>:%>en Terminatives ;
%<s_pl1%>:%>oʼon Terminatives ;
%<s_sg2%>:%>ech Terminatives ;
%<s_pl2%>:%>eʼex Terminatives ;
%<s_sg1%>:%>en Terminatives ;
%<s_sg3%>:0 Terminatives ;
%<s_sg3%>:%>ih Terminatives ;
%<s_pl3%>:%>oʼob Terminatives ;

LEXICON PluralSubjSuffix
%<s_pl3%>:%>oʼob Terminatives ;
%<s_pl2%>:%>eʼex Terminatives ;
Terminatives ;

LEXICON DeicticTerminatives
%<prx%>:%>aʼ # ;
%<dst%>:%>oʼ # ;
# ;


!LEXICON AspectualTerminatives
!! these are endings to the aspect markers laili and taant
!%<cont%>:%>eʼ # ; ! Laili'
!%<cess%>:%>eʼ # ; ! taant
!%<fut%>:%>eʼ # ; ! he'el


LEXICON Terminatives
%<neg%>:%>iʼ # ;
%<loc%>:%>iʼ # ;
%<top%>:%>eʼ # ;
# ;

! these are endings to the aspect markers laili and taant
%<cont%>:%>eʼ # ; ! Laili' 
%<cess%>:%>eʼ # ; ! taant 
%<fut%>:%>eʼ # ; ! he'el 

DeicticTerminatives ;
# ;

LEXICON RegIntransVozActivaSinL
%<ipfv%>:0 PluralSubjSuffix; ! IntransitiveSetB;
%<pfv%>:0 IntransitiveSetB;
!%<pfv%>:ih IntransitiveSetB; ! phrase finally (when there are no terminatives)
%<pf%>:%>ahaʼan IntransitiveSetB;
%<subj%>:%>%{V%}k IntransitiveSetB;
%<imp%>%<s_2sg%>:%>en Terminatives;
%<imp%>%<s_2pl%>:%>en%>eʼex Terminatives;

LEXICON RegIntransVozActivaConL
%<ipfv%>:%>%{V%}l PluralSubjSuffix;
%<pfv%>:0 IntransitiveSetB;
!%<pfv%>:ih IntransitiveSetB; ! phrase finally (when there are no terminatives)
%<pf%>:%>ahaʼan IntransitiveSetB;
%<subj%>:%>%{V%}k IntransitiveSetB;
%<imp%>%<s_2sg%>:%>en Terminatives;
%<imp%>%<s_2pl%>:%>eneʼex Terminatives;

LEXICON RegIntransDvT
%<ipfv%>:%>ik TransitiveSetB;
%<ipfv%>:%>k TransitiveSetB; ! Dir/LR

%<pfv%>:%>ah TransitiveSetB;
%<pf%>:%>mah TransitiveSetB;
%<subj%>:0 TransitiveSetB;
%<subj%>:eh TransitiveSetB;
%<imp%>%<s_2sg%>:%>eh Terminatives;
%<imp%>%<s_2sg%>:0 Terminatives;
%<imp%>%<s_2pl%>:0 PluralSubjSuffix;

LEXICON RegIntransDvTVozPasiva
%<ipfv%>:%>%{V%}l PluralSubjSuffix;
%<pfv%>:0 IntransitiveSetB;
%<pf%>:%>aʼan IntransitiveSetB;
%<subj%>:%>ak IntransitiveSetB;

! TODO: check on this....whatʼs the plural ending?
%<imp%>:%>aʼak Terminatives;

LEXICON RegIntransDvTVozAntipasiva

%<ipfv%>:%>ah IntransitiveSetB;
%<pfv%>:%>ah%>nah IntransitiveSetB;
%<pf%>:%>ah%>nahaʼan IntransitiveSetB;
%<subj%>:%>ah%>nak IntransitiveSetB;

! TODO: check on this....whatʼs the plural ending?
%<imp%>:%>ahnak Terminatives;

LEXICON TransVozActiva
%<ipfv%>:%>ik TransitiveSetB;
%<pfv%>:%>ah TransitiveSetB;
%<pf%>:%>m%>ah TransitiveSetB;
%<subj%>:0 TransitiveSetB;
%<subj%>:%>eh TransitiveSetB;
%<imp%>:0 TransitiveSetB;
%<imp%>:%>eh TransitiveSetB;


LEXICON TransVozAntipasiva
%<ipfv%>:0 PluralSubjSuffix;
%<pfv%>:%>nah IntransitiveSetB; ! TODO: for all of the following entries, the geminate "n%>n -> n"
%<pf%>:%>nahaʼan IntransitiveSetB;
%<subj%>%<s_sg%>:%>nak IntransitiveSetB;
%<imp%>:%>nen IntransitiveSetB;

LEXICON TransVozPasiva
%<ipfv%>:%>%{V%}l PluralSubjSuffix;
%<pfv%>:%>aʼab IntransitiveSetB;
%<pf%>:%>aʼan IntransitiveSetB;
%<subj%>:%>%{V%}k IntransitiveSetB;
! %<imp%>:%{V%}k IntransitiveSetB;  ! this is kind of weird, eg "be loved!" TODO verify that it is a valid form

LEXICON IrregularTransVozPasiva
%<ipfv%>:%>aʼal PluralSubjSuffix;
%<pfv%>:%>aʼab IntransitiveSetB;
%<pf%>:%>aʼan IntransitiveSetB;
%<subj%>:%>aʼak IntransitiveSetB;
! %<imp%>:aʼak IntransitiveSetB;

LEXICON TransVozMedia
%<ipfv%>:%>%{V%}l PluralSubjSuffix;
%<pfv%>:0 IntransitiveSetB;
%<pf%>:%>aʼan IntransitiveSetB;
%<subj%>:%>%{V%}k IntransitiveSetB;
%<imp%>:0 IntransitiveSetB;


LEXICON PossessiveNominalSuffixes
%<poss_comm%>:%>il IntransitiveSetB ;
%<poss_nonownership%>:%>al IntransitiveSetB ;
%<poss_internal%>:%>el IntransitiveSetB ;
PluralSuffix ;
IntransitiveSetB ;

LEXICON PluralSuffix
%<pl%>:%>oʼob Terminatives ;
%<2p_pl%>:%>eʼex Terminatives ;
# ;

LEXICON NounEndings
Terminatives ;
PluralSuffix ;
IntransitiveSetB ;
PossessiveNominalSuffixes ;
# ;

LEXICON NominalClassifiers
túul%<clfanim%>:tuul PluralSubjSuffix ;
túul%<clfanim%>:túul PluralSubjSuffix ;

pʼéel%<clfinan%>:pʼéel PluralSubjSuffix ;
hun%<clfinan%>%+pʼéel%<num%>:humpʼéel # ; ! Dir/LR
hun%<clfinan%>%+pʼéel%<num%>:hunpʼéel # ;
hun%<clfanim%>%+túul%<num%>:huntúul # ;

LEXICON Numbers
hun%<num%>:hun # ;
kaʼa%<num%>:kaʼa # ;
óox%<num%>:óox # ;
kam%<num%>:kam # ;
hó%<num%>:hó # ;

LEXICON Adposition
tak%<adp%>:tak # ; ! hasta
tiʼi%<adp%>:tiʼ PluralSuffix ; ! to _ (introduces indirect obj or location)
tiʼi%<adp%>:tʼ PluralSuffix ; ! to _ (introduces indirect obj or location)
teʼe%<adp%>:teʼ PluralSuffix ; ! to _ (introduces indirect obj)
tumen%<adp%>:tumen # ; ! por
yòokʼsal%<adp%>:yòokʼsal # ; ! para

yóokʼol%<adp%>:yóokʼol # ; ! arriba (de)
yáan%<adp%>:yáan # ; ! "abajo de"

yáanal%<adp%>:yáanal # ; ! below (this might not be the right tag...it is usually "u yáanal", should this be a noun?


LEXICON TerminacionesInterrogativas
0:%>ih # ;
Terminatives ;
# ;

LEXICON Interrogativos
wáah%<part%>%<itg%>:wáah #; ! yes/no question particle


baʼax%<prn%>%<itg%>:baʼax TerminacionesInterrogativas ; !qué
baʼax%<prn%>%<itg%>:baʼan TerminacionesInterrogativas ; !qué Dir/LR
baʼax%<prn%>%<itg%>:baax TerminacionesInterrogativas ; !qué Dir/LR
baʼax%<prn%>%<itg%>:baan TerminacionesInterrogativas ; !qué Dir/LR
baʼax%<prn%>%<itg%>:báan TerminacionesInterrogativas ; !qué Dir/LR

bix%<adv%>%<itg%>:bix TerminacionesInterrogativas ; ! cómo
tuʼux%<adv%>%<itg%>:tuʼux TerminacionesInterrogativas ; ! dónde
máax%<prn%>%<itg%>:máax TerminacionesInterrogativas ; ! quién
máakalmáak%<prn%>%<itg%>:máakalmáak TerminacionesInterrogativas ; ! quién
ba’axten%<adv%>%<itg%>:ba’axten TerminacionesInterrogativas ; ! por qué
ba’axten%<adv%>%<itg%>:ba’anten TerminacionesInterrogativas ; ! por qué Dir/LR



LEXICON AdverbialEndings
Terminatives ;
# ;

LEXICON Adverb
xan%<adv%>:xan AdverbialEndings ; ! also/too
sáansamal%<adv%>:sáansamal AdverbialEndings; ! everyday
sáamal%<adv%>:sáamal AdverbialEndings; ! tomorrow
bey%<adv%>:bey DeicticTerminatives ; ! like so
chen%<adv%>:chen # ; ! "just"
chen%<adv%>:chéen # ; ! "just"
chan%<adv%>:chan # ; ! "poquito"
sen%<adv%>:sen # ; ! "very"
alkabil%<adv%>:alkabil # ; ! "running(ly)"

haylibeʼ%<adv%>:haylibeʼ # ; ! "therefore, thus"

seten%<adv%>:seten # ; ! "muy"

mix%<adv%>:mix # ; ! "ni, negativo"

séeb%<adv%>:séeb # ; ! "quickly"

behláʼ%<adv%>:behláʼ AdverbialEndings ; ! hoy
beʼelaʼ%<adv%>:beʼelaʼ AdverbialEndings ;

haʼatsʼkab%<adv%>:haʼatsʼkab AdverbialEndings ; ! "(in the) early morning"
way%<adv%>:way AdverbialEndings ; ! "aquí"
hach%<adv%>:hach AdverbialEndings ; ! "muy..."
chanbéelil%<adv%>:chanbéelil AdverbialEndings ; ! despacio
kaʼakaʼat%<adv%>:kaʼakaʼat AdverbialEndings ; ! después

! fixme: wtf this should be standardized in the pedagogical texts!
beyòoraʼa%<adv%>:beyòoraʼa AdverbialEndings; ! now
beyòoraʼa%<adv%>:beyòoraʼ AdverbialEndings; ! now
beyòoraʼa%<adv%>:beyòorah AdverbialEndings; ! now
behòoraʼa%<adv%>:behòoraʼa AdverbialEndings; ! now
behòoraʼa%<adv%>:behòoraʼ AdverbialEndings; ! now  behòoráa<-- this is the standard correct
behòoraʼa%<adv%>:behòorah AdverbialEndings; ! now
behòoraʼa%<adv%>:beyhòorah AdverbialEndings; ! now

túun%<adv%>:túun AdverbialEndings; ! entonces
wa%<adv%>:wa # ;

mas%<adv%>%<barb%>:mas # ;
màas%<adv%>%<barb%>:mas # ;


ma’atan%<adv%>:ma’atan AdverbialEndings ; ! never
ma’atech%<adv%>:ma’atech AdverbialEndings ; ! never

LEXICON Conjunction
kux%<cnjcoo%>:kux # ; ! y...

yèetel%<cnjcoo%>:yèetel Terminatives ;
yèetel%<cnjcoo%>:yetel Terminatives ; ! Dir/LR

pero%<cnjcoo%>%<barb%>:pero Terminatives ; ! Dir/LR

kah%<cnjsub%>:kah # ;
kah%<cnjsub%>:ka # ; ! Dir/LR 

wa%<cnjsub%>:wa # ;

utiʼal%<cnjsub%>:utiʼal # ; ! Dir/LR fixme: add this as ti'al with a pron like intial
utyaʼal%<cnjsub%>:utyaʼal # ;
tuméen%<cnjsub%>:tuméen # ;

LEXICON Noun
tsíimin%<n%>:tsíimin NounEndings ; ! "caballo"
huʼunalte%<n%>:huʼunalte NounEndings ; ! "libro"
pʼùus%<n%>:pʼùus NounEndings ; ! "hunchback / joroba/jorobado"
mùukʼ%<n%>:mùukʼ NounEndings ; ! "fuerza"
láak%<n%>:láak NounEndings ; ! todo
chúumuk%<n%>:chumuk NounEndings ; ! centro (variación ortográfica)
ixiʼim%<n%>:ixiʼim NounEndings ; ! maiz
yùum%<n%>:yùum NounEndings ; ! father, God
LEXICON IntransReg
bin%<v%>%<iv%>:bin RegIntransVozActivaSinL ;
bin%<v%>%<iv%>%<imp%>:xèen RegIntransVozActivaSinL ;
óokʼot%<v%>%<iv%>:óokʼot RegIntransVozActivaSinL ;
óokʼot%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:óokʼot%>t IrregularTransVozPasiva ;
éem%<v%>%<tv%>:éem%>s RegIntransDvT ;
míis%<v%>%<iv%>:míis RegIntransVozActivaSinL ;
kíim%<v%>%<iv%>:kíim RegIntransVozActivaConL ;
kíim%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:kíim%>s IrregularTransVozPasiva ;
kíim%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:kíim%>s RegIntransDvTVozAntipasiva ;
páakʼ%<v%>%<iv%>:páakʼ RegIntransVozActivaSinL ;
páakʼ%<v%>%<tv%>:paʼa%>t RegIntransDvT ;
páakʼ%<v%>%<tv%>:paʼa%>t RegIntransDvTVozPasiva ;
páakʼ%<v%>%<tv%>:paʼa%>t RegIntransDvTVozAntipasiva ;
hóokʼ%<v%>%<iv%>:hóokʼ RegIntransVozActivaConL ;
hóokʼ%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:hóokʼ%>s IrregularTransVozPasiva ;
hoʼopʼ%<v%>%<tv%>:hoʼopʼ%>s RegIntransDvT ;
hoʼopʼ%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:hoʼopʼ%>s RegIntransDvTVozAntipasiva ;
báax%<v%>%<iv%>:báax RegIntransVozActivaConL ;
báax%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:báax%>t RegIntransDvTVozPasiva ;
máan%<v%>%<tv%>:máan%>s RegIntransDvT ;
meyah%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:meyah%>t RegIntransDvTVozAntipasiva ;
mèen%<v%>%<iv%>:mèen RegIntransVozActivaConL ;
mèen%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:mèen%>t RegIntransDvTVozPasiva ;
ok%<v%>%<tv%>:ok%>s RegIntransDvT ;
òok%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:òok%>s RegIntransDvTVozAntipasiva ;
ah%<v%>%<iv%>:%{wy%}ah RegIntransVozActivaConL ;
ah%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:%{wy%}ah%>s RegIntransDvTVozPasiva ;
núuk%<v%>%<tv%>:núuk RegIntransDvT ;
tùukul%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:tùukul IrregularTransVozPasiva ;
tùukul%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:tùukl IrregularTransVozPasiva ;
tsʼíib%<v%>%<tv%>:tsʼíib%>t RegIntransDvT ;
tsʼíib%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:tsʼíib%>t IrregularTransVozPasiva ;
tsʼíib%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:tsʼíib%>t RegIntransDvTVozAntipasiva ;
ok%<v%>%<iv%>:ok RegIntransVozActivaConL ;
báab%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:báab%>s RegIntransDvTVozPasiva ;
ichkíil%<v%>%<iv%>:ichkíil RegIntransVozActivaSinL ;
ichkíil%<v%>%<tv%>:ichkíil%>t RegIntransDvT ;
ichkíil%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:ichkíil%>t RegIntransDvTVozAntipasiva ;
naʼak%<v%>%<iv%>:naʼak RegIntransVozActivaConL ;
naʼak%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:naʼak%>s RegIntransDvTVozPasiva ;
lúub%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:lúub%>s RegIntransDvTVozAntipasiva ;
boʼol%<v%>%<iv%>:boʼol RegIntransVozActivaConL ;
bèel%<v%>%<tv%>:bèe%{l%}%>t RegIntransDvT ;
bèel%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:bèe%{l%}%>t RegIntransDvTVozPasiva ;
belar%<v%>%<iv%>:belar RegIntransVozActivaSinL ;
naʼat%<v%>%<iv%>:naʼat RegIntransVozActivaConL ;
naʼat%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:naʼat RegIntransDvTVozPasiva ;
LEXICON CvcTrans
bon%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:bòon TransVozAntipasiva ;
buh%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:buʼuh TransVozPasiva ;
buk%<v%>%<tv%>:buk TransVozActiva ;
bul%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:bùul TransVozAntipasiva ;
chʼin%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:chʼiʼin TransVozPasiva ;
chʼin%<v%>%<iv%>%<mv%>:chʼíin TransVozMedia ;
chʼul%<v%>%<tv%>:chʼul TransVozActiva ;
hay%<v%>%<iv%>%<mv%>:háay TransVozMedia ;
huchʼ%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:hùuchʼ TransVozAntipasiva ;
kʼex%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:kʼeʼex TransVozPasiva ;
kʼex%<v%>%<iv%>%<mv%>:kʼéex TransVozMedia ;
hakʼ%<v%>%<tv%>:hakʼ TransVozActiva ;
kon%<v%>%<tv%>:kon TransVozActiva ;
lukʼ%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:lùukʼ TransVozAntipasiva ;
lah%<v%>%<iv%>%<mv%>:láah TransVozMedia ;
makʼ%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:maʼakʼ TransVozPasiva ;
muk%<v%>%<iv%>%<mv%>:múuk TransVozMedia ;
pʼak%<v%>%<tv%>:pʼak TransVozActiva ;
pʼat%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:pʼàat TransVozAntipasiva ;
pʼil%<v%>%<iv%>%<mv%>:pʼíil TransVozMedia ;
pʼo%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:pʼoʼo TransVozPasiva ;
puchʼ%<v%>%<tv%>:puchʼ TransVozActiva ;
weʼeweʼekpuchʼ%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:weʼeweʼekpùuchʼ TransVozAntipasiva ;
tʼan%<v%>%<iv%>%<mv%>:tʼáan TransVozMedia ;
tʼul%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:tʼuʼul TransVozPasiva ;
tab%<v%>%<tv%>:tab TransVozActiva ;
tsʼak%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:tsʼàak TransVozAntipasiva ;
tsʼil%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:tsʼiʼil TransVozPasiva ;
tus%<v%>%<tv%>:tus TransVozActiva ;
tus%<v%>%<iv%>%<mv%>:túus TransVozMedia ;
wix%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:wìix TransVozAntipasiva ;
pul%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:puʼul TransVozPasiva ;
